hr-HR: Primjena propana: Viljuškar; Roštilj; Grijanje; Vozila za rekreaciju (RV); Baklja; Ostalo
sk-SK: Aplikácia propánu: Vysokozdvižný vozík; Grilovanie; Kúrenie; Rekreačné vozidlá (RV); Baterka; Iné
el: Εφαρμογή προπανίου: Περονοφόρο ανυψωτικό; Γκριλ; Θέρμανση; Οχήματα αναψυχής (RV); Δάδα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Utilizarea propanului: Stivuitor; Grătar; Încălzire; Vehicule de agrement (RV); Torță; Altele
pl: Zastosowanie propanu: Wózek widłowy; Grill; Ogrzewanie; Pojazdy rekreacyjne (RV); Latarka; Inne
sl-SI: Uporaba propana: Viličar; Peka na žaru; Ogrevanje; Rekreacijska vozila (RV); Bakla; Drugo
da: Propanpåføring: Gaffeltruck; Grill; Opvarmning; Fritidskøretøjer (RV); Fakkel; Andet
th: การใช้งานโพรเพน: รถยก; ย่าง; การทำความร้อน; รถบ้าน (RV); คบเพลิง; อื่นๆ
nl: Toepassing propaan: Heftruck; Grill; Verwarming; Recreatievoertuigen; Fakkel; Andere
ru: Назначение пропана: Вилочный погрузчик; Гриль; Обогрев; Автодома (RV); Факел; Другой
en: Propane application: Forklift; Grill; Heating; Recreational vehicles (RV); Torch; Other
cs: Aplikace propanu: Vysokozdvižný vozík; Gril; Topení; Rekreační vozidla (RV); Pochodeň; Jiné
lt-LT: Propano paskirtis: Šakinis krautuvas; Grilius; Šildymas; Kemperiai (RV); Deglas; Kita
bg-BG: Приложение на пропан: Мотокар; Грил; Отопление; Кемпери (RV); Факел; Други
tr: Propan uygulaması: Forklift; Izgara; Isıtma; Karavanlar (RV); Meşale; Diğer
zh-CN: 丙烷应用: 叉车; 烤架; 加热; 休闲车 (RV); 火焰枪; 其他
vi: Ứng dụng khí dầu hoả: Xe nâng; Nướng; Đun nóng; Xe dã ngoại (RV); Ngọn đuốc; Khác
ja: プロパンの用途: フォークリフト; グリル; 暖房; RV車; トーチ; その他
nb: Bruk av propan: Gaffeltruck; Grill; Oppvarming; Fritidskjøretøy (RV); Fakkel; Annet
pt-PT: Aplicação de propano: Empilhadeira; Grade; Aquecimento; Veículos recreativos (VR); Tocha; Outro
hu: Propángáz alkalmazási területe: Targonca; Grillezés; Fűtés; Szabadidős járművek; Fáklya; Egyéb
pt-BR: Aplicação de propano: Empilhadeira; Grade; Aquecimento; Veículos recreacionais (VR); Maçarico; Outro
sv: Propantillämpning: Gaffeltruck; Grill; Uppvärmning; Nöjesfordon (RV); Ficklampa; Övrigt
it: Applicazione del propano: Carrello elevatore; Grill; Riscaldamento; Veicoli ricreativi (RV); Torcia; Altro
de: Anwendung des Propans: Gabelstapler; Grill; Heizung; Wohnmobile; Fackel; Sonstiges
fi: Propaanin käyttökohde: Trukki; Grilli; Lämmitys; Matkailuautot; Soihtu; Muu
zh-TW: 丙烷應用: 堆高機; 炙烤; 加熱; 露營車（RV）; 火炬; 其他
ko: 프로판 도포: 지게차; 그릴; 난방; 레저 차량(RV); 토치; 기타
fr: Application de propane: Chariot élévateur; Gril; Chauffage; Véhicules récréatifs (VR); Torche; Autre
es: Aplicación de propano: Montacarga; Parrilla; Calefacción; Vehículos recreativos (RV); Antorcha; Otros